incubator/apertium-ron-ina/apertium-ron-ina.ina.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="fut"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="in__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="plus__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tote__predet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adjective__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="excellent/e__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>issime</l>
          <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="si__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="le__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="un__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="iste__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="se__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ist/e__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prpers__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>io</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ille</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>illa</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>illo</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>illes</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>illas</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>illos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lo</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vos</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>las</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>los</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ora__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="catto__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="can__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="roc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="in"><i>in</i><par n="in__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="in__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i>de</i><par n="in__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="apud"><i>apud</i><par n="in__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tote"><i>tote</i><par n="tote__predet"/></e>
    <e lm="plus"><i>plus</i><par n="plus__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="si"><i>si</i><par n="si__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="e__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="e__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="le"><i>le</i><par n="le__det"/></e>
    <e lm="un"><i>un</i><par n="un__det"/></e>
    <e lm="iste"><i>iste</i><par n="iste__det"/></e>
    <e lm="iste"><i>ist</i><par n="ist/e__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="prpers"><i></i><par n="prpers__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="se__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="roc"><i>roc</i><par n="roc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amar"><i>amar</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blande"><i>blande</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="clar"><i>clar</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="directe"><i>directe</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fatue"><i>fatue</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="indispensabile"><i>indispensabile</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="japonese"><i>japonese</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="melior"><i>melior</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="necesse"><i>necesse</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="octave"><i>octave</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="possibile"><i>possibile</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="quiete"><i>quiete</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rubie"><i>rubie</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="significante"><i>significante</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vespertin"><i>vespertin</i><par n="adjective__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="actualmente"><i>actualmente</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="alteremente"><i>alteremente</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ci"><i>ci</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="etiam"><i>etiam</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="frequentemente"><i>frequentemente</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="illac"><i>illac</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jammais"><i>jammais</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="multo"><i>multo</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pois"><i>pois</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rapidemente"><i>rapidemente</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sovente"><i>sovente</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tanto"><i>tanto</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="unquam"><i>unquam</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aere"><i>aere</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="auro"><i>auro</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="camera"><i>camera</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cocina"><i>cocina</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="database"><i>database</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="epicentro"><i>epicentro</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filio"><i>filio</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="granpatre"><i>granpatre</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lente"><i>lente</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="montania"><i>montania</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="patata"><i>patata</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="remo"><i>remo</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="surriso"><i>surriso</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vocabulo"><i>vocabulo</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abnegation"><i>abnegation</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="accusation"><i>accusation</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="august"><i>august</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="electron"><i>electron</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flor"><i>flor</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imperator"><i>imperator</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="invitation"><i>invitation</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leon"><i>leon</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="million"><i>million</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pictor"><i>pictor</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="predicator"><i>predicator</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="question"><i>question</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="roc"><i>roc</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soror"><i>soror</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
